Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
PEDESTRIANS' RIGHTS AND DUTIES

[§291C-71] Pedestrian obedience to
traffic-control devices and traffic regulations. (a) A pedestrian shall
obey the instructions of any official traffic-control device specifically
applicable to the pedestrian, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.

(b) Pedestrians shall be subject to traffic
and pedestrian-control signals as provided in sections 291C-32 and 291C-33.

(c) At all other places, pedestrians shall be
accorded the privileges and shall be subject to the restrictions stated in this
chapter. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next